apertium-cs-sl.cs.dix
    <pardef n="Luneti/c__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>c</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>c</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kem</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ku</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ků</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kum</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kům</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>cích</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kách</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>kama</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ky</l><r>c<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Jo/yce__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>yce</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yce</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yce</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iceovi</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iceovi</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>icem</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>icei</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iceové</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>yce</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iceů</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iceům</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iceích</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>icei</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>iceové</l><r>yce<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Sta/něk__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l>něk</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňka</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňka</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňkovi</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňkovi</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňkem</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňku</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňci</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňkové</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňky</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňků</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňkům</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňcích</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňky</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňci</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>ňkové</l><r>něk<s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ŽĎAS__np_m">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>u</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>em</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p>          <l>e</l><r><s n="np"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/Corporation__np_f">
      <e><p>          <l>corporation</l><r>Corporation<s n="np"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="HV__np_nt">
      <e><p>          <l></l><r><s n="np"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="ABC"><i>ABC</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ABS"><i>ABS</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="AG"><i>AG</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="API"><i>API</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ATP"><i>ATP</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Aarau"><i>Aarau</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Adelaide"><i>Adelaide</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Adobe"><i>Adobe</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Angeles"><i>Angeles</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Apache"><i>Apache</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Auxerre"><i>Auxerre</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="BBC"><i>BBC</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="BMW"><i>BMW</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Bari"><i>Bari</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Berkeley"><i>Berkeley</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Berlinale"><i>Berlinale</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Brisbane"><i>Brisbane</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="CD"><i>CD</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="CME"><i>CME</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="CNC"><i>CNC</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="CNN"><i>CNN</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="CSKA"><i>CSKA</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Cagliari"><i>Cagliari</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Calgary"><i>Calgary</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Cali"><i>Cali</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Cannes"><i>Cannes</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Ce"><i>Ce</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Celje"><i>Celje</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Chile"><i>Chile</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Chinaski"><i>Chinaski</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Combi"><i>Combi</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Corporation"><i></i><par n="/Corporation__np_f"/></e>
    <e lm="DTP"><i>DTP</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Dušanbe"><i>Dušanbe</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="EIA"><i>EIA</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="EURO"><i>EURO</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="FS"><i>FS</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="FSB"><i>FSB</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Falco"><i>Falco</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Fenerbahce"><i>Fenerbahce</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Fujitsu"><i>Fujitsu</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Fé"><i>Fé</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Gillette"><i>Gillette</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Giro"><i>Giro</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Giuseppe"><i>Giuseppe</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Goražde"><i>Goražde</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="GŘ"><i>GŘ</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="HME"><i>HME</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="HMS"><i>HMS</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="HV"><i>HV</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Haiti"><i>Haiti</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="He"><i>He</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="IBCA"><i>IBCA</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="IFK"><i>IFK</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="JZD"><i>JZD</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Joyce"><i>Jo</i><par n="Jo/yce__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Jumanji"><i>Jumanji</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="KDH"><i>KDH</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="KTM"><i>KTM</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Kóbe"><i>Kóbe</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="LTC"><i>LTC</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Lake"><i>Lake</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Lecce"><i>Lecce</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Lockerbie"><i>Lockerbie</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Lunetic"><i>Luneti</i><par n="Luneti/c__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Lustenau"><i>Lustenau</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ME"><i>ME</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="MIDI"><i>MIDI</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="MMX"><i>MMX</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="MPO"><i>MPO</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="MTB"><i>MTB</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="MZ"><i>MZ</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Malmö"><i>Malmö</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Marseille"><i>Marseille</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Monroe"><i>Monroe</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Mégane"><i>Mégane</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="MŠMT"><i>MŠMT</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="NATO"><i>NATO</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ND"><i>ND</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Nairobi"><i>Nairobi</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="OBI"><i>OBI</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="OH"><i>OH</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="OO"><i>OO</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="PCMCIA"><i>PCMCIA</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Pale"><i>Pale</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Pleasantville"><i>Pleasantville</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="PÚ"><i>PÚ</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="RC"><i>RC</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="RFE"><i>RFE</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ROH"><i>ROH</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="RPR"><i>RPR</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="RTL"><i>RTL</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="RW"><i>RW</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Rennes"><i>Rennes</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Romale"><i>Romale</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="SBD"><i>SBD</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="SDA"><i>SDA</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="SNP"><i>SNP</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="SPR"><i>SPR</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="SQL"><i>SQL</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Seagate"><i>Seagate</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Sm"><i>Sm</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Staněk"><i>Sta</i><par n="Sta/něk__np_m"/></e>
    <e lm="Street"><i>Street</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Sue"><i>Sue</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="TC"><i>TC</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="TS"><i>TS</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="TVX"><i>TVX</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Tbilisi"><i>Tbilisi</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="UNI"><i>UNI</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Udine"><i>Udine</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Urquell"><i>Urquell</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Val"><i>Val</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Waikiki"><i>Waikiki</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Xtreme"><i>Xtreme</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ZD"><i>ZD</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="Zimbabwe"><i>Zimbabwe</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ČKD"><i>ČKD</i><par n="HV__np_nt"/></e>
    <e lm="ŽĎAS"><i>ŽĎAS</i><par n="ŽĎAS__np_m"/></e>
